Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 5
COOPERATIVE HEALTH CARE AGREEMENTS
INVOLVING HOSPITALS

25.5-1-501 to 25.5-1-516. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part repealed, p. 1800, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 5 was added in 1995. For amendments to this part 5 prior to its repeal in 2006, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.